California statutes. Penal Code
(d) The board shall collect annually from all counties information on county incarceration rates, average daily jail populations as a proportion of the total county population or total arrests or both; pretrial misdemeanant ratios, the percentage which unsentenced prisoners charged only with misdemeanors constitute the total average daily unsentenced jail population; and sentenced alternatives ratios, for example, average daily populations in work-in-lieu of jail programs and county parole as a percentage of the total average daily sentenced misdemeanant prisoner population. All counties that have received or will receive state funds for jail construction shall supply the board the information necessary to comply with this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.16.

If after a hearing, the board makes a finding that a county has failed to comply with a condition or plan approved by the board relating to the requirements of Section 4485.6, the board may require the county to pay an amount equal to the pro rata portion of the principal and interest, paid by the state on bonds the proceeds of which were allocated pursuant to this chapter to the county for the period of noncompliance. The repayment provisions shall not be applicable if the noncompliance with the condition or plan is the result of circumstances beyond the control of the county, or the board finds the county cannot reasonably
 comply under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Juvenile Facilities [4497.20. - 4497.38.]

4497.20.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority is hereby directed to administer the moneys intended for juvenile facilities in the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) It is the intention of the Legislature to make the money appropriated for allocation under this chapter available to counties with established and documented needs for capital projects for juvenile facilities.

(c) Counties that apply for funds to alleviate overcrowding shall submit a preliminary staffing plan for the proposed facility, along with an analysis of other operating costs anticipated for the facility, to the Department of the Youth Authority for review and comment. Prior to submission of the staffing plan and operating cost analysis to the department, the board of supervisors shall have reviewed and approved the submittal in or following public hearings. The chief probation officer shall also have reviewed and commented on the preliminary staffing plan and operating cost analysis. The department shall comment in writing to the chief probation officer and board of supervisors. This response shall be a public record.

(d) The Department of the Youth Authority shall conduct an assessment of the needs of counties for juvenile facilities in California which shall be submitted to the Legislature by June 30, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.22.

Funds appropriated to the Department of the Youth Authority for allocation under this chapter shall be allocated as provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.24.

Two million three hundred fifty-seven thousand seven hundred seventy-eight dollars ($2,357,778) shall be set aside initially for the counties that did not have juvenile facilities on January 1, 1987. These funds shall be used to construct county juvenile facilities and are hereby allocated as follows:Amador $ 33,000Calaveras 80,000Colusa 218,928Glenn 213,850Inyo 846,000Lassen 350,000Mariposa 50,000Modoc 126,000Mono 18,000Plumas 45,000San Benito 243,000Sierra 10,000Trinity 30,000Tuolumne 94,000

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.26.

Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be set aside initially for counties that do not have efficient and adequate facilities for youth with special problems. Two or more counties may apply jointly to construct those facilities regionally. No more than three million three hundred thousand dollars ($3,300,000) shall be awarded for the construction of each regional facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.28.

Forty-eight million nine hundred sixty-seven thousand two hundred twenty-two dollars ($48,967,222) shall be set aside initially for counties to alleviate overcrowding and eliminate health, fire, and life safety deficiencies in juvenile facilities or provide efficient and adequate facility for youth with special problems. These funds are hereby allocated to all counties except those listed in Section 4497.24, as follows:Alameda $ 2,378,878Butte 303,787Contra Costa 1,329,808Del Norte 34,798El Dorado 210,354Fresno 1,064,299Humboldt 201,133Imperial 196,087Kern 901,792Kings 163,725Lake 89,431Los Angeles 14,970,647Madera 143,542Marin 400,004Mendocino 132,407Merced 297,871Monterey 605,660Napa 184,952Nevada 134,321Orange 3,934,095Placer 272,121Riverside 1,700,581Sacramento 1,696,928San Bernardino 2,235,602San Diego 4,123,745San Francisco 1,275,871San Joaquin 794,440San Luis Obispo 360,682San Mateo 1,093,529Santa Barbara 596,961Santa Clara 2,488,758Santa Cruz 393,914Shasta 242,890Siskiyou 75,338Solano 544,764Sonoma 636,457Stanislaus 591,915Sutter 107,352Tehama 81,253Tulare 517,621Ventura 1,125,195Yolo 234,887Yuba 98,827

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 877, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.30.

(a) Two million two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($2,225,000) shall be set aside initially for bond interest costs, and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be set aside to conduct a statewide assessment of the counties’ needs for juvenile facilities.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 5.5 of Chapter 1130 of the Statutes of 1989, up to two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) shall be available for assistance to counties in planning and development
 of projects funded under Section 5 of Chapter 1327 of the Statutes of 1989 and in accordance with Section 4497.20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 877, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.32.

(a) Funds which were set aside initially as provided by Sections 4497.24 to 4497.30, inclusive, that are not used and funds that were allocated under the provisions of the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986 that are not used shall be allocated by the Department of the Youth Authority to those counties that received an allocation under Section 4497.28 which was not sufficient to fund the remaining portion of the total cost of the approved projects. The amount of each of those county’s allocation shall be that county’s per capita share of the total funds available for all
 counties with partially funded projects, or the amount needed to complete funding of that county’s approved projects, whichever is less. At no time shall the allocation exceed 75 percent of the total eligible costs.

(b) The allocation procedure described in subdivision (a) shall be repeated until all of the available funds are awarded.

(c) Funds awarded by the Department of the Youth Authority under this section shall be used for the construction, reconstruction, remodeling, or replacement of county juvenile facilities, and for the performance of deferred maintenance on juvenile facilities, but may only be used for the purpose of reducing current overcrowding and eliminating health, fire, and life safety hazards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.34.

(a) Counties with overcrowded juvenile facilities shall not be eligible to receive funds to construct, reconstruct, remodel, or replace juvenile facilities unless they have adopted a plan to correct overcrowded conditions within their facilities which includes the use of alternatives to detention. The corrective action plan shall provide for the use of five or more methods or procedures to minimize the number of minors detained and shall be approved by the board of supervisors during or subsequent to a public hearing.

(b) To be eligible for funding under this chapter, the county shall enter into a contract with the Department of the Youth Authority and begin construction or renovation work within six years of the operative date of the regulations that implement this chapter. If a county fails to meet this requirement, any allocations or awards to that county under this chapter shall be deemed void and any moneys allocated or awarded to that county shall revert to the Department of the Youth Authority for reallocation to another county as provided by Section 4497.32. The department may waive this requirement if it determines that there are unavoidable delays in starting construction.

(c) To be eligible for funding for juvenile facilities under the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure Bond Act of 1986, the county shall enter into a contract with the Department of the Youth Authority and
 begin construction or renovation work by July 31, 1991. If a county fails to meet this requirement, all allocations or awards that have been made to that county under that act shall be deemed void and any moneys allocated or awarded to that county shall revert to the Department of the Youth Authority and are reappropriated for reallocation as provided by Section 4497.32. The department may waive this requirement if it determines that there are unavoidable delays in starting construction.

(d) Excluding moneys allocated for San Bernardino County, the Department of the Youth Authority shall immediately reallocate unused awards to eligible participating counties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   Effective October 13, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.36.

An application for funds shall be in the manner and form prescribed by the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1327, Sec. 5.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.38.

(a) Awards shall be made only if county matching funds of 25 percent are provided except as specified in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) A county or a consortium of counties may request the Director of the Department of the Youth Authority for a deferral of payment of the required matching funds for the construction of a juvenile detention facility. This request shall be approved if the county or consortium of counties meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The county or consortium of counties has plans for the construction of the facility approved by the Department of the Youth Authority.

(B) The facility to be built is located in Humboldt County.

(C) The county or consortium of counties submits to and receives approval by the Department of the Youth Authority, a plan and schedule for payment of the required match.

(2) Contribution of the county or consortium of counties matching requirement shall commence no later than three years from the date of occupation of any facility financed under this chapter.

(3) Under no circumstances shall the county match for any county juvenile project be less than 25 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 6, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Purchase of Correctional Industry Products For Correctional, Juvenile, and Youth Facilities [4497.50. - 4497.56.]

4497.50.

In order to be eligible to receive funds derived from the issuance of General Obligation Bonds under the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988, a county or city and county shall do all of the following:

(a) In the design and planning of facilities whose construction, reconstruction, or remodeling is financed under the County Correctional Facility Capital Expenditure and Youth Facility Bond Act of 1988, products for construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishings produced and sold by the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority shall be utilized in the plans and specifications unless the
 county or city and county demonstrates either of the following to the satisfaction of the Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(1) The products cannot be produced and delivered without causing delay to the construction of the property.

(2) The products are not suitable for the facility or competitively priced and cannot otherwise be reasonably adapted.

(b) Counties and cities and counties shall consult with the staff of the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority to develop new products and adapt existing products to their needs.

(c) The Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, shall not enter into any contract with any county or city and county until that county’s or city and county’s plan for purchase from and consultation with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local jail industry program is reviewed and approved by the Board of State and Community Corrections or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 47.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.52.

Notwithstanding any other law, a county or city and county may contract for the purchase of products as specified in Section 4497.50 with the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority or local Jail Industry Authority without the formality of obtaining bids or otherwise complying with provisions of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 48.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.54.

The California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority shall designate an individual as County Jail and Juvenile Facility Liaison who shall work with counties to maximize the utilization of California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority products for construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishing, to ensure that manufactured products meet the contract specifications and delivery dates, and to ensure consultation with counties for development of new products and adaption of existing products to meet their needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 49.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4497.56.

It is the intent of the Legislature to maximize the utilization of California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority products for jail construction, renovation, equipment, and furnishings to ensure that prisoners work productively and contribute to reducing the cost to the taxpayers of their incarceration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 50.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5. OFFENSES RELATING TO PRISONS AND PRISONERS [4500. - 4758.]



  CHAPTER 1. Offenses by Prisoners [4500. - 4504.]

4500.

Every person while undergoing a life sentence, who is sentenced to state prison within this state, and who, with malice aforethought, commits an assault upon the person of another with a deadly weapon or instrument, or by any means of force likely to produce great bodily injury is punishable with death or life imprisonment without possibility of parole. The penalty shall be determined pursuant to the provisions of Sections 190.3 and 190.4; however, in cases in which the person subjected to such assault does not die within a year and a day after such assault as a proximate result thereof, the punishment shall be imprisonment in the state prison for life without the possibility of parole for nine years.

For the purpose of computing the days elapsed between the commission of the assault and the death of the person assaulted, the whole of the day on which the assault was committed shall be counted as the first day.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the application of this section when the assault was committed outside the walls of any prison if the person committing the assault was undergoing a life sentence and was serving a sentence to a state prison at the time of the commission of the assault and was not on parole, on probation, or released on bail pending an appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1445, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4500, every person confined in the state prison of this state who commits an assault upon the person of another with a deadly weapon or instrument shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state prison for two, four, or six years to be served consecutively.

(b) Except as provided in Section 4500, every person confined in the state prison of this state who commits an assault upon the person of another by any means of force likely to produce great bodily injury shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state prison for two, four, or six years to be served consecutively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 401.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.1.

(a) Every person confined in the state prison who commits a battery by gassing upon the person of any peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2, or employee of the state prison is guilty of aggravated battery and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail or by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years. Every state prison inmate convicted of a felony under this section shall serve his or her term of imprisonment as prescribed in Section 4501.5.

(b) For purposes of this section, “gassing” means intentionally placing or throwing, or causing to be placed or thrown, upon the person of another, any human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily
 substances or any mixture containing human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily substances that results in actual contact with the person’s skin or membranes.

(c) The warden or other person in charge of the state prison shall use every available means to immediately investigate all reported or suspected violations of subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, the use of forensically acceptable means of preserving and testing the suspected gassing substance to confirm the presence of human excrement or other bodily fluids or bodily substances. If there is probable cause to believe that the inmate has violated subdivision (a), the chief medical officer of the state prison or his or her designee, may, when he or she deems it medically necessary to protect the health of an officer or employee who may have been subject to a violation of this section, order the inmate to receive an examination or test for hepatitis or tuberculosis or both
 hepatitis and tuberculosis on either a voluntary or involuntary basis immediately after the event, and periodically thereafter as determined to be necessary by the medical officer in order to ensure that further hepatitis or tuberculosis transmission does not occur. These decisions shall be consistent with an occupational exposure as defined by the Center for Disease Control and Prevention. The results of any examination or test shall be provided to the officer or employee who has been subject to a reported or suspected violation of this section. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to otherwise supersede the operation of Title 8 (commencing with Section 7500). Any person performing tests, transmitting test results, or disclosing information pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability for any action taken in accordance with this section.

(d) The warden or other person in charge of the state prison shall refer all
 reports for which there is probable cause to believe that the inmate has violated subdivision (a) to the local district attorney for prosecution.

(e) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall report to the Legislature, by January 1, 2000, its findings and recommendations on gassing incidents at the state prison and the medical testing authorized by this section. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The total number of gassing incidents at each state prison facility up to the date of the report.

(2) The disposition of each gassing incident, including the administrative penalties imposed, the number of incidents that are prosecuted, and the results of those prosecutions, including any penalties imposed.

(3) A profile of the inmates who commit the aggravated batteries, including the number of inmates who have one or more prior serious or violent felony convictions.

(4) Efforts that the department has taken to limit these incidents, including staff training and the use of protective clothing and goggles.

(5) The results and costs of the medical testing authorized by this section.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution under both this section and any other provision of law.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 484) by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 38.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.5.

Every person confined in a state prison of this state who commits a battery upon the person of any individual who is not himself a person confined therein shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state prison for two, three, or four years, to be served consecutively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

(a) Every person who, while at or confined in any penal institution, while being conveyed to or from any penal institution, or while under the custody of officials, officers, or employees of any penal institution, possesses or carries upon his or her person or has under his or her custody or control any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, or metal knuckles, any explosive substance, or fixed ammunition, any dirk or dagger or sharp instrument, any pistol, revolver, or other firearm, or any tear gas or tear gas weapon, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years, to be served consecutively.

(b) Every person who, while at or confined in any penal institution, while being conveyed to or from any penal institution, or while under the custody of officials, officers, or employees of any penal institution, manufactures or attempts to manufacture any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slungshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, or metal knuckles, any explosive substance, or fixed ammunition, any dirk or dagger or sharp instrument, any pistol, revolver, or other firearm, or any tear gas or tear gas weapon, is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, to be served consecutively.

(c) For purposes of this section, “penal institution” means the state prison, a prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or farm, or a county jail or county road
 camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 485.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

Any person confined therein who holds as hostage any person within any prison or facility under the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections, or who by force or threat of force holds any person or persons against their will in defiance of official orders within any such prison or facility, shall be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state prison for three, five, or seven years to be served consecutively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) A person is deemed confined in a “state prison” if he or she is confined in any of the prisons and institutions specified in Section 5003 by order made pursuant to law, including, but not limited to, commitments to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Justice, regardless of the purpose of the confinement and regardless of the validity of the order directing the confinement, until a judgment of a competent court setting aside the order becomes final.

(b) A person is deemed “confined in” a
 prison although, at the time of the offense, he or she is temporarily outside its walls or bounds for the purpose of serving on a work detail, for the purpose of confinement in a local correctional institution pending trial, or for any other purpose for which a prisoner may be allowed temporarily outside the walls or bounds of the prison. A prisoner who has been released on parole is not deemed “confined in” a prison for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 499, Sec. 5.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Escapes and Rescues [4530. - 4550.]



  ARTICLE 1. Escapes [4530. - 4537.]

4530.

(a) Every prisoner confined in a state prison who, by force or violence, escapes or attempts to escape therefrom and every prisoner committed to a state prison who, by force or violence, escapes or attempts to escape while being conveyed to or from that prison or any other state prison, or any prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or any other place while under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees; or who, by force or violence, escapes or attempts to escape from any prison road camp, prison forestry camp, or other prison camp or prison farm or other place while under the custody of prison officials, officers or employees; or who, by force or violence, escapes or attempts to escape while at work outside or away from prison under
 custody of prison officials, officers, or employees, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of two, four, or six years. The second term of imprisonment of a person convicted under this subdivision shall commence from the time he or she would otherwise have been discharged from prison. No additional probation report shall be required with respect to that offense.

(b) Every prisoner who commits an escape or attempts an escape as described in subdivision (a), without force or violence, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years to be served consecutively. No additional probation report shall be required with respect to such offense.

(c) The willful failure of a prisoner who is employed or continuing his education, or who is authorized to secure employment or education, or who is temporarily released pursuant to Section
 2690, 2910, or 6254, or Section 3306 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to return to the place of confinement not later than the expiration of a period during which he or she is authorized to be away from the place of confinement, is an escape from the place of confinement punishable as provided in this section. A conviction of a violation of this subdivision, not involving force or violence, shall not be charged as a prior felony conviction in any subsequent prosecution for a public offense.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 486) by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 39.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

4532.

(a) (1) Every prisoner arrested and booked for, charged with, or convicted of a misdemeanor, and every person committed under the terms of Section 5654, 5656, or 5677 of the Welfare and Institutions Code as an inebriate, who is confined in any county or city jail, prison, industrial farm, or industrial road camp, is engaged on any county road or other county work, is in the lawful custody of any officer or person, is employed or continuing in his or her regular educational program or authorized to secure employment or education away from the place of confinement, pursuant to the Cobey Work Furlough Law (Section 1208), is authorized for temporary release for family emergencies or for purposes preparatory to his or her return to the community pursuant to Section
 4018.6, or is a participant in a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018, and who thereafter escapes or attempts to escape from the county or city jail, prison, industrial farm, or industrial road camp or from the custody of the officer or person in charge of him or her while engaged in or going to or returning from the county work or from the custody of any officer or person in whose lawful custody he or she is, or from the place of confinement in a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018 is guilty of a felony and, if the escape or attempt to escape was not by force or violence, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a determinate term of one year and one day, or in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(2) If the escape or attempt to escape described in paragraph (1) is committed by force or violence, the person is guilty of a felony, punishable by
 imprisonment in the state prison for two, four, or six years to be served consecutively, or in a county jail not exceeding one year. When the second term of imprisonment is to be served in a county jail, it shall commence from the time the prisoner otherwise would have been discharged from jail.

(3) A conviction of a violation of this subdivision, or a violation of subdivision (b) involving a participant of a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018 that is not committed by force or violence, shall not be charged as a prior felony conviction in any subsequent prosecution for a public offense.

(b) (1) Every prisoner arrested and booked for, charged with, or convicted of a felony, and every person committed by order of the juvenile court, who is confined in any county or city jail, prison, industrial farm, or industrial road
 camp, is engaged on any county road or other county work, is in the lawful custody of any officer or person, or is confined pursuant to Section 4011.9, is a participant in a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018 who escapes or attempts to escape from a county or city jail, prison, industrial farm, or industrial road camp or from the custody of the officer or person in charge of him or her while engaged in or going to or returning from the county work or from the custody of any officer or person in whose lawful custody he or she is, or from confinement pursuant to Section 4011.9, or from the place of confinement in a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, is guilty of a felony and, if the escape or attempt to escape was not by force or violence, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, two years, or three years, to be served consecutively, or in a county jail not exceeding one year.

(2) If the escape or attempt to escape described in paragraph (1) is committed by force or violence, the person is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for a full term of two, four, or six years to be served consecutively to any other term of imprisonment, commencing from the time the person otherwise would have been released from imprisonment and the term shall not be subject to reduction pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1170.1, or in a county jail for a consecutive term not to exceed one year, that term to commence from the time the prisoner otherwise would have been discharged from jail.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, every inmate who is a participant in an alternative custody program pursuant to Section 1170.05 who escapes or attempts to escape from the program is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(d) (1) Except
 in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served if the person is granted probation, probation shall not be granted to any person who is convicted of a felony offense under this section in that he or she escaped or attempted to escape from a secure main jail facility, from a court building, or while being transported between the court building and the jail facility.

(2) In any case in which a person is convicted of a violation of this section designated as a misdemeanor, he or she shall be confined in a county jail for not less than 90 days nor more than one year except in unusual cases where the interests of justice would best be served by the granting of probation.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “main jail facility” means the facility used for the detention of persons pending arraignment, after arraignment, during trial, and upon sentence or
 commitment. The facility shall not include an industrial farm, industrial road camp, work furlough facility, or any other nonsecure facility used primarily for sentenced prisoners. As used in this subdivision, “secure” means that the facility contains an outer perimeter characterized by the use of physically restricting construction, hardware, and procedures designed to eliminate ingress and egress from the facility except through a closely supervised gate or doorway.

(4) If the court grants probation under this subdivision, it shall specify the reason or reasons for that order on the court record.

(5) Any sentence imposed under this subdivision shall be served consecutive to any other sentence in effect or pending.

(e) The willful failure of a prisoner, whether convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor, to return to
 his or her place of confinement no later than the expiration of the period that he or she was authorized to be away from that place of confinement, is an escape from that place of confinement. This subdivision applies to a prisoner who is employed or continuing in his or her regular educational program, authorized to secure employment or education pursuant to the Cobey Work Furlough Law (Section 1208), authorized for temporary release for family emergencies or for purposes preparatory to his or her return to the community pursuant to Section 4018.6, or permitted to participate in a home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018. A prisoner convicted of a misdemeanor who willfully fails to return to his or her place of confinement under this subdivision shall be punished as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). A prisoner convicted of a felony who willfully fails to return to his or her place of confinement shall be punished as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 487.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4533.

Every keeper of a prison, sheriff, deputy sheriff, or jailer, or person employed as a guard, who fraudulently contrives, procures, aids, connives at, or voluntarily permits the escape of any prisoner in custody, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, and fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 488.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

4534.

Any person who willfully assists any paroled prisoner whose parole has been revoked, any escapee, any prisoner confined in any prison or jail, or any person in the lawful custody of any officer or person, to escape, or in an attempt to escape from such prison or jail, or custody, is punishable as provided in Section 4533.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

4535.

Every person who carries or sends into a prison or jail anything useful to aid a prisoner or inmate in making his escape, with intent thereby to facilitate the escape of any prisoner or inmate confined therein, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

4536.

(a) Every person committed to a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility as a mentally disordered sex offender, who escapes from or who escapes while being conveyed to or from such state hospital or other public or private mental health facility, is punishable by imprisonment in the state prison or in the county jail not to exceed one year. The term imposed pursuant to this section shall be served consecutively to any other sentence or commitment.

(b) The medical director or person in charge of a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility to which a person has been committed as a mentally disordered sex offender shall promptly notify the chief of police of the city in which the
 hospital or facility is located, or the sheriff of the county if the hospital or facility is located in an unincorporated area, of the escape of the person, and shall request the assistance of the chief of police or sheriff in apprehending the person, and shall, within 48 hours of the escape of the person, orally notify the court that made the commitment, the prosecutor in the case, and the Department of Justice of the escape.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 56.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4536.5.

The medical director or person in charge of a state hospital or other public or private mental health facility to which a person has been committed under the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall promptly notify the Department of Corrections’ Sexually Violent Predator Parole Coordinator, the chief of police of the city in which the hospital or facility is located, or the sheriff of the county if the hospital or facility is located in an unincorporated area, of the escape of the person, and shall request the assistance of the chief of police or sheriff in apprehending the person, and shall, within 48 hours of the escape of the person, orally notify the court that made the commitment, the prosecutor in the case, and the Department of Justice of the escape.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 156.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4537.
